Washington statutes.
RCW 26.38.220

Transitional provisions.

RCW 26.38.100 through 26.38.120 and 26.38.130 apply to:

(1) A transfer of custody on or after June 9, 2022; and

(2) Soliciting or advertising on or after June 9, 2022.

[ 2022 c 88 s 303.]